Illinois, session 104th, SB2697.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Emerald City Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purposes of this Act are (1) to 7improve Illinois' ability to mitigate the damage that emerald 8ash borers are causing throughout the State by increasing 9public awareness of the topic; (2) to expand local government 10access to grants and low-cost loans for the replacement of ash 11trees with trees that are better suited to life in cities and 12villages; (3) to address issues caused by the rules adopted to 13alleviate emerald ash borer infestations in the State; and (4) 14to unite persons with diverse perspectives and to encourage 15them to collaborate with one another to tackle the obstacles 16that emerald ash borers pose and will continue to pose if 17nothing effective is done to address the issue. 18    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act, unless the context 19requires otherwise:20    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency.21    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.22    "Fund" means the Emerald City Fund established under this   SB2697- 2 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1Act.2    "Task Force" means the Emerald City Task Force established 3under this Act. 4    Section 15. Emerald City Task Force. 5    (a) The Emerald City Task Force is established in the 6Department of Natural Resources for the purposes described in 7Section 5 of this Act. The Task Force may consult with the 8Environmental Protection Agency, and the Agency may consult 9with the Task Force, at the discretion of the Task Force or the 10Agency.11    (b) The Task Force has the following responsibilities:12        (1) launching public awareness campaigns throughout 13    Illinois to educate residents about the many detrimental 14    effects of emerald ash borers and to describe actions 15    residents can take to decrease the spread of these 16    invasive insects;17        (2) supporting and coordinating increased funding, 18    grants, and low-cost loans to municipalities and units of 19    local government to replace dead ash trees;20        (3) organizing community engagement activities for 21    children, such as poster, bumper-sticker, and slogan 22    contests;23        (4) investigating the reasons why the statewide 24    quarantine is not as effective as hoped by, among other 25    things, determining whether there is or was a lack of   SB2697- 3 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1    people willing to serve as enforcement officers, a lack of 2    funding to isolate quarantine zones, a lack of 3    equipment-based resources, or other causes or factors 4    contributing to the lack of program effectiveness;5        (5) investigating the reasons why the low-cost loans 6    being given to local governments for tree replacement are 7    not as effective as hoped by, among other things, 8    determining whether or not the loans themselves are 9    effective, whether the loans simply need to be expanded 10    across greater areas, or whether the relevant program has 11    other defects that deter local governments from making use 12    of the loans; and13        (6) researching methods to mitigate the spread of 14    emerald ash borers in a sustainable manner.15    (c) Public awareness campaigns under this Section and 16support and coordination for municipalities and units of local 17government under this Section shall use a mixture of the 18objective findings of researchers, as well as 19emotionally-touching and heartfelt first-hand accounts and 20stories from people who have been hit the hardest by emerald 21ash borers. The Task Force shall launch public awareness 22campaigns through (1) partnerships with public schools, (2) 23social media platforms, (3) community-wide awareness events, 24(4) posters and QR codes for residents to learn more about 25emerald ash borers, and (5) explaining how residents can (i) 26play their part in mitigating the spread of emerald ash borers   SB2697- 4 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1or (ii) directly get involved with the Emerald City Task Force 2by donating money or by becoming a volunteer.3    (d) By January 1, 2027, and by January 1 of each year 4thereafter, the Task Force shall submit a report to the 5General Assembly, as provided in Section 3.1 of the General 6Assembly Organization Act, and to the Governor on the actions 7it has taken and the progress it has made toward addressing its 8responsibilities in the immediately preceding year. 9    Section 20. Task Force membership; meetings; support; 10funding. 11    (a) The Emerald City Task Force shall consist of the 12following members:13        (1) the Director of Natural Resources or the 14    Director's designee, who shall serve as a co-chairperson;15        (2) the Director of the Environmental Protection 16    Agency or the Director's designee, who shall serve as a 17    co-chairperson;18        (3) one member of the Senate who is appointed by the 19    President of the Senate and who is willing (i) to help 20    organize educational campaigns throughout Illinois in 21    order to inform residents about the detrimental effects of 22    emerald ash borers from a variety of perspectives and (ii) 23    to speak with local government officials to ascertain the 24    reason for the lower-than-hoped use of low-cost loans;25        (4) one member of the Senate who is appointed by the   SB2697- 5 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1    Senate Minority Leader and who is willing (i) to help 2    organize educational campaigns throughout Illinois in 3    order to inform residents about the detrimental effects of 4    emerald ash borers from a variety of perspectives and (ii) 5    to speak with local government officials to ascertain the 6    reason for the lower-than-hoped use of low-cost loans;7        (5) one member of the House of Representatives who is 8    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives 9    and who is willing (i) to help organize educational 10    campaigns throughout Illinois in order to inform residents 11    about the detrimental effects of emerald ash borers from a 12    variety of perspectives and (ii) to speak with local 13    government officials to ascertain the reason for the 14    lower-than-hoped use of low-cost loans;15        (6) one member of the House of Representatives who is 16    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 17    Representatives and who is willing (i) to help organize 18    educational campaigns throughout Illinois in order to 19    inform residents about the detrimental effects of emerald 20    ash borers from a variety of perspectives and (ii) to 21    speak with local government officials to ascertain the 22    reason for the lower-than-hoped use of low-cost loans;23        (7) 3 residents of the State who are appointed by the 24    Governor and who are willing to share the impact that 25    emerald ash borers have had on them from a personal 26    perspective, including at least one person who has worked   SB2697- 6 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1    in the ash tree industry and at least one person whose 2    household falls under the definition of "low-income 3    household" or "very low-income household" under Section 3 4    of the Illinois Affordable Housing Act;5        (8) 3 residents of the State who are appointed by the 6    Governor and who either reside in environmental justice 7    communities, as defined by the Illinois Power Agency, or 8    in municipalities without the funding to replace ash 9    trees;10        (9) 3 residents of the State who are appointed by the 11    Governor and who are willing to help organize educational 12    campaigns throughout Illinois in order to inform residents 13    about the detrimental effects of emerald ash borers from a 14    variety of perspectives;15        (10) 3 experts or other professionals who are 16    appointed by the Governor and who are able to investigate 17    the reasons that the statewide quarantine regarding 18    emerald ash borers is or was not as effective as hoped; and19        (11) 3 experts or other researchers, such as 20    researchers from the University of Illinois' College of 21    Agriculture, Consumer, and Environmental Sciences, who are 22    appointed by the Governor and are able to investigate 23    methods to decrease the spread of emerald ash borers in a 24    sustainable manner.25    (b) The Task Force shall convene and meet at the call of a 26co-chairperson and shall meet as frequently as necessary to   SB2697- 7 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1carry out its duties as required by this Act.2    (c) The Department of Natural Resources shall provide 3administrative and other support to the Task Force. Upon 4reasonable request by the Task Force, the Environmental 5Protection Agency shall also provide administrative and other 6support to the Task Force. 7    (d) Fines collected for violations of rules adopted under 8Section 35 of the Insect Pest and Plant Disease Act shall be 9paid into the Emerald City Fund, a special fund that is created 10in the State treasury, and, subject to appropriation, may be 11expended by and for the Emerald City Task Force in the 12fulfillment of its purposes, the carrying out of its 13responsibilities, and any other requirements as determined by 14the Task Force. The Fund may also accept donations from 15individuals, corporations, or other entities, including by 16means of corporate sponsorship related to the Emerald City 17Task Force. Task Force members shall serve without 18compensation but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and 19necessary expenses from funds appropriated for that purpose. 20    Section 25. Rulemaking. The Department may adopt rules 21necessary to implement recommendations of the Task Force. 22    Section 70. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 23Section 5.1038 as follows:   SB2697- 8 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)2    Sec. 5.1038. The Emerald City Fund.  3    Section 75. The Insect Pest and Plant Disease Act is 4amended by changing Sections 22 and 22.01 as follows: 5    (505 ILCS 90/22)  (from Ch. 5, par. 82)6    Sec. 22. Any person who shall violate any of the 7provisions of this Act with reference to the sale, shipment, 8transportation, receipt or delivery of nursery stock without 9inspection or certificate, or with reference to treatment of 10nursery stock, plants, plant products or other property; or 11who shall forge, counterfeit, deface, alter, destroy or 12wrongfully use a certificate belonging to another person or 13fail to obtain a certificate of inspection or nursery dealer's 14certificate; or who shall use a certificate after it has been 15suspended or revoked or has expired; or who shall transport, 16receive or convey any article into the State of Illinois in 17violation of any proclamation of the Governor or regulation of 18the Department or any Federal quarantine, or who, having 19received the same directly or indirectly shall refuse to 20dispose of the same as the Department may direct; or who shall 21violate any proclamation of the Governor or quarantine or 22rule, regulation or order of the Department as provided for in 23this Act; or who shall maintain a nuisance after receiving 24notice from the Department to abate the same shall be adjudged   SB2697- 9 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1guilty of a business offense and shall be subject to a fine of 2not less than $1,000 nor more than $10,000. Except for fines 3collected for violations of rules adopted under Section 35 of 4this Act, the The fines collected under this Act shall be paid 5to the Department and by it paid into the Pesticide Control 6Fund, Director as Trustee, to be used for the administration 7of this Act. Fines collected for violations of rules adopted 8under Section 35 of this Act shall be paid into the Emerald 9City Fund established under Section 20 of the Emerald City 10Task Force Act to be used according to Section 20 of the 11Emerald City Task Force Act. 12    Any person who impedes, obstructs, hinders or otherwise 13prevents or attempts to prevent the Director in the 14performance of official duties shall be guilty of a Class B 15misdemeanor for the first violation and guilty of a Class A 16misdemeanor for subsequent violations. Any person using 17physical force against the Director in the performance of 18official duties shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.19(Source: P.A. 85-324.) 20    (505 ILCS 90/22.01)  (from Ch. 5, par. 82a)21    Sec. 22.01. When an administrative hearing is held, the 22hearing officer shall upon determination of a violation, on a 23per-occurrence basis, assess an appropriate administrative 24monetary penalty. The Department shall collect the 25administrative monetary penalty which will be paid as   SB2697- 10 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1described under Section 22 of this Act to the Pesticide 2Control Fund to be used for the administration of this Act for 3the following violations:4    I. A fine of $150 shall be imposed for each of the 5following violations: 6        A. Thwarting or hindering an inspection authorized or 7    required by this Act by misrepresenting or concealing 8    facts or conditions. 9        B. Selling, offering or exposing for sale, or 10    distributing nursery stock which is not accompanied by a 11    shipping tag or label bearing a copy of the certificate of 12    inspection or nursery dealer's certificate. 13        C. Failing to comply with any of the provisions of 14    this Act, or the rules and regulations promulgated 15    hereunder for which a fine for a specific violation is not 16    specified. 17        D. Making a false declaration of acreage or causing 18    any concealment of nursery stock from inspection by the 19    Department. 20        E. Selling, offering for sale, or distributing nursery 21    stock or other article infested with injurious insect 22    pests or infected with injurious plant diseases.23    II. A fine of $300 shall be imposed for each of the 24following violations: 25        A. Failing to carry out the treatment or destruction 26    of any plant pest or regulated article in accordance with   SB2697- 11 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1    official notification from the Director. 2        B. Selling, transporting, or offering for sale nursery 3    stock which has not been inspected and which is not 4    covered by a valid certificate of inspection. 5        C. Selling, offering or exposing for sale or 6    delivering any nursery stock without having a current 7    certificate of inspection or nursery dealer's certificate.8    III. A fine of $500 shall be imposed for each of the 9following violations: 10        A. Using an invalid, suspended, or revoked nursery 11    certificate or nursery dealer's certificate in the sale or 12    distribution of nursery stock. 13        B. Neglecting or refusing to comply with provisions of 14    this Act or any lawful order of the Director. 15        C. Moving any regulated article into or out of a 16    quarantined area unless such regulated article has been 17    treated or handled as provided by the requirements of said 18    quarantine. 19        D. Selling, installing or otherwise distributing 20    nursery stock or other article which has been placed on 21    stop-sale.22    IV. A fine of not less than $500 but not greater than 23$5,000 shall be imposed for each of the following violations 24related to a devastating insect or plant disease: 25        A. Thwarting or hindering an inspection by 26    misrepresenting or concealing facts or conditions related   SB2697- 12 -LRB104 15269 BDA 28659 b1    to compliance with the terms of the quarantine. 2        B. Selling, offering for sale, or distributing nursery 3    stock or other articles infested with devastating insects 4    or plant diseases in violation of the quarantine. 5        C. Failing to carry out the treatment or destruction 6    of any devastating insect or plant disease or regulated 7    article as required under the terms of the quarantine and 8    in accordance with official notification from the 9    Director. 10        D. Moving any regulated article into or out of the 11    quarantined area unless the regulated article has been 12    treated or handled as provided by the requirements of the 13    quarantine. 14        E. Falsifying a compliance agreement under the 15    quarantine.16    Any penalty not paid within 60 days of notice from the 17Department shall be submitted to the Attorney General's office 18for collection. Failure to pay a penalty shall also be grounds 19for suspension or revocation of certificates and permits.20(Source: P.A. 91-713, eff. 6-2-00.)